Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2224.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 22-2510 is hereby amended to read as follows: 22-
2510. (a) A search warrant may be executed at any time of any day or
night.
(b) A law enforcement officer executing a search warrant at a
dwelling shall be properly uniformed and shall knock on the door and
announce their presence in a manner reasonably expected to be heard by
the occupants of the dwelling before entering the dwelling to execute a
search warrant.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "dwelling" means a building, or
portion thereof, that is used or intended for use as a human habitation,
home or residence.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 22-2510 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.